Idaho statutes. Title 2 JURIES AND JURORS
Chapter 5
IMPANELING JURIES

Section.

§ 2-501. Grand jury — Impaneling on order of judge.

Grand juries shall not hereafter be drawn, summoned or required to attend at the sittings of any court within the state, as provided by law, unless the district judge as assigned by the administrative judge shall so order in writing. The order shall be filed with the clerk of the court and a copy of the order shall be delivered to the jury commission and prosecuting attorney.

§ 2-502. Grand jury — How constituted — Quorum.

Sixteen (16) persons shall constitute a grand jury, twelve (12) of whom shall constitute a quorum, and when of the jurors summoned, no more nor less than sixteen (16) attend they shall constitute the grand jury. If more than sixteen (16) attend the clerk shall call over the list summoned, and the sixteen (16) first answering shall constitute the grand jury. If less than sixteen (16) attend, the panel may be filled to sixteen (16).

§ 2-503. Grand jury — How impaneled.

Thereafter such proceedings shall be had in impaneling the grand jury as are prescribed by the criminal practice.

§ 2-504, 2-505. Trial jurors — Procedure at time order made returnable — Manner of impaneling jury. [Repealed.]

§ 2-506. Impaneling jury in probate or justice’s court. [Repealed.]

§ 2-507. Impaneling juries — Criminal cases

Civil cases. [Repealed.]

§ 2-508. Impaneling of juries of inquest.

The mode and manner of impaneling juries of inquest are provided for in the provisions of the different statutes relating to such inquests.